dic/ligurian_IT.aff
#------------------------------------------------
# FLAG DESCRIPTIONS
# @: circumfix
# *: forbidden word
# AR: verb 1st conjugation, stressed prefix, regular case
# AI: verb 1st conjugation, stressed prefix, non-silent 'i'
# Ar: verb 1st conjugation, unstressed prefix
# BR: verb 2nd conjugation, stressed prefix, regular case
# Br: verb 2nd conjugation, unstressed prefix, regular case
# BT: verb 2nd conjugation, stressed prefix, derived from Latin "trahĕre"
# Bt: verb 2nd conjugation, unstressed prefix, derived from Latin "trahĕre"
# BL: verb 2nd conjugation, stressed prefix, derived from Latin "lĕgĕre"
# Bl: verb 2nd conjugation, unstressed prefix, derived from Latin "lĕgĕre"
# CR: verb 3rd conjugation, stressed prefix, regular case
# Cr: verb 3rd conjugation, unstressed prefix, regular case
# DR: verb 4th conjugation, stressed prefix, regular case
# Dr: verb 4th conjugation, unstressed prefix, regular case
# at: verb 2s "ti" elision
# ae: verb 3s euphonic particle
#------------------------------------------------

# TODO: continue developing the spellchecker
#       see if there are other available tasks
#       use a shared GitHub repo for the project

SET UTF-8
FLAG long
KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm
TRY AÀÂÄÆBCÇDEÉÈÊËFGHIÌÎÏLMNÑOÓÒÔÖPQRSTUÙÛÜVXZJKWYaàâäæbcçdeéèêëfghiìîïlmnñoóòôöpqrstuùûüvxzjkwy
WORDCHARS '

MAP 7
MAP aàâäæ
MAP cç
MAP eéèêë
MAP iìîï
MAP nñ
MAP oóòôö
MAP uùûü

CIRCUMFIX @
FORBIDDENWORD *

SFX AR Y 9
SFX AR 0 0 . is:present_ind_1s
SFX AR o i/at [^cgi]o is:present_ind_2s is:present_subj_2s
SFX AR o hi/at [cg]o is:present_ind_2s is:present_subj_2s
SFX AR io i/at [cg]io is:present_ind_2s is:present_subj_2s
SFX AR o a/ae . is:present_ind_3s is:imperative_2s
SFX AR o an . is:present_ind_3p is:present_subj_3p
SFX AR o e/ae [^cgi]o is:present_subj_1s is:present_subj_3s
SFX AR o he/ae [cg]o is:present_subj_1s is:present_subj_3s
SFX AR io e/ae [cg]io is:present_subj_1s is:present_subj_3s

SFX AI Y 5
SFX AI 0 0 . is:present_ind_1s
SFX AI o i/at [cg]io is:present_ind_2s is:present_subj_2s
SFX AI o a/ae [cg]io is:present_ind_3s is:imperative_2s
SFX AI o an [cg]io is:present_ind_3p is:present_subj_3p
SFX AI o e/ae [cg]io is:present_subj_1s is:present_subj_3s

SFX Ar Y 51
SFX Ar emmo â [^cgh]emmo is:infinitive
SFX Ar hemmo â [cg]hemmo is:infinitive
SFX Ar emmo iâ [cg]emmo is:infinitive
SFX Ar emmo ou [^cgh]emmo is:past_participle
SFX Ar hemmo ou [cg]hemmo is:past_participle
SFX Ar emmo iou [cg]emmo is:past_participle
SFX Ar emmo ando [^cgh]emmo is:gerund
SFX Ar hemmo ando [cg]hemmo is:gerund
SFX Ar emmo iando [cg]emmo is:gerund
SFX Ar 0 0 . is:present_ind_1p is:present_subj_1p
SFX Ar emmo æ [^cgh]emmo is:present_ind_2p is:present_subj_2p is:imperative_2p
SFX Ar hemmo æ [cg]hemmo is:present_ind_2p is:present_subj_2p is:imperative_2p
SFX Ar emmo iæ [cg]emmo is:present_ind_2p is:present_subj_2p is:imperative_2p
SFX Ar emmo ava/ae [^cgh]emmo is:imperfect_ind_1s is:imperfect_ind_3s
SFX Ar hemmo ava/ae [cg]hemmo is:imperfect_ind_1s is:imperfect_ind_3s
SFX Ar emmo iava/ae [cg]emmo is:imperfect_ind_1s is:imperfect_ind_3s
SFX Ar emmo avi/at [^cgh]emmo is:imperfect_ind_2s is:imperfect_ind_2p
SFX Ar hemmo avi/at [cg]hemmo is:imperfect_ind_2s is:imperfect_ind_2p
SFX Ar emmo iavi/at [cg]emmo is:imperfect_ind_2s is:imperfect_ind_2p
SFX Ar emmo avimo [^cgh]emmo is:imperfect_ind_1p
SFX Ar hemmo avimo [cg]hemmo is:imperfect_ind_1p
SFX Ar emmo iavimo [cg]emmo is:imperfect_ind_1p
SFX Ar emmo avan [^cgh]emmo is:imperfect_ind_3p
SFX Ar hemmo avan [cg]hemmo is:imperfect_ind_3p
SFX Ar emmo iavan [cg]emmo is:imperfect_ind_3p
SFX Ar emmo iò [^i]emmo is:future_ind_1s
SFX Ar emmo ò iemmo is:future_ind_1s
SFX Ar emmo iæ/atae [^i]emmo is:future_ind_2s is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Ar emmo æ/atae iemmo is:future_ind_2s is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Ar emmo ià [^i]emmo is:future_ind_3s
SFX Ar emmo à iemmo is:future_ind_3s
SFX Ar emmo iemo [^i]emmo is:future_ind_1p
SFX Ar emmo emo iemmo is:future_ind_1p
SFX Ar emmo iei [^i]emmo is:future_ind_2p
SFX Ar emmo ei iemmo is:future_ind_2p
SFX Ar emmo ian [^i]emmo is:future_ind_3p
SFX Ar emmo an iemmo is:future_ind_3p
SFX Ar emmo esse/ae . is:imperfect_subj_1s is:imperfect_subj_3s
SFX Ar emmo esci/at . is:imperfect_subj_2s is:imperfect_subj_2p
SFX Ar emmo escimo . is:imperfect_subj_1p
SFX Ar emmo essan . is:imperfect_subj_3p
SFX Ar emmo ieiva/ae [^i]emmo is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Ar emmo eiva/ae iemmo is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Ar emmo iësci/at [^i]emmo is:conditional_2s is:conditional_2p
SFX Ar emmo ësci/at iemmo is:conditional_2s is:conditional_2p
SFX Ar emmo iëscimo [^i]emmo is:conditional_1p
SFX Ar emmo ëscimo iemmo is:conditional_1p
SFX Ar emmo ieivan [^i]emmo is:conditional_3p
SFX Ar emmo eivan iemmo is:conditional_3p
SFX Ar emmo iæn [^i]emmo is:conditional_3p
SFX Ar emmo æn iemmo is:conditional_3p

SFX BR Y 4
SFX BR 0 0 . is:present_ind_1s
SFX BR o i/at . is:present_ind_2s is:present_subj_2s is:imperative_2s
SFX BR o e/ae . is:present_ind_3s is:present_subj_1s is:present_subj_3s
SFX BR o an . is:present_ind_3p is:present_subj_3p

SFX Br Y 23
SFX Br emmo ei . is:infinitive is:present_ind_2p is:present_subj_2p is:imperative_2p
SFX Br emmo uo . is:past_participle
SFX Br emmo endo . is:gerund
SFX Br 0 0 . is:present_ind_1p is:present_subj_1p
SFX Br emmo eiva/ae . is:imperfect_ind_1s is:imperfect_ind_3s
SFX Br emmo eivi/at . is:imperfect_ind_2s is:imperfect_ind_2p
SFX Br emmo eivimo . is:imperfect_ind_1p
SFX Br emmo eivan . is:imperfect_ind_3p
SFX Br emmo iò . is:future_ind_1s
SFX Br emmo iæ/atae . is:future_ind_2s is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Br emmo ià/ae . is:future_ind_3s
SFX Br emmo iemo . is:future_ind_1p
SFX Br emmo iei . is:future_ind_2p
SFX Br emmo ian . is:future_ind_3p
SFX Br emmo esse/ae . is:imperfect_subj_1s is:imperfect_subj_3s
SFX Br emmo esci/at . is:imperfect_subj_2s is:imperfect_subj_2p
SFX Br emmo escimo . is:imperfect_subj_1p
SFX Br emmo essan . is:imperfect_subj_3p
SFX Br emmo ieiva/ae . is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Br emmo iësci/at . is:conditional_2s is:conditional_2p
SFX Br emmo iëscimo . is:conditional_1p
SFX Br emmo ieivan . is:conditional_3p
SFX Br emmo iæn . is:conditional_3p

SFX BT Y 8
SFX BT 0 0 . is:present_ind_1s
SFX BT aggo æ/at . is:present_ind_2s
SFX BT aggo à/ae . is:present_ind_3s
SFX BT aggo an . is:present_ind_3p
SFX BT aggo agghe/ae . is:present_subj_1s is:present_subj_3s
SFX BT aggo agghi/at . is:present_subj_2s
SFX BT aggo aggan . is:present_subj_3p
SFX BT aggo anni . is:imperative_2s

SFX Bt Y 24
SFX Bt emmo ae . is:infinitive
SFX Bt emmo æto . is:past_participle
SFX Bt emmo ando . is:gerund
SFX Bt 0 0 . is:present_ind_1p is:present_subj_1p
SFX Bt emmo æ . is:present_ind_2p is:present_subj_2p is:imperative_2p
SFX Bt emmo ava/ae . is:imperfect_ind_1s is:imperfect_ind_3s
SFX Bt emmo avi/at . is:imperfect_ind_2s is:imperfect_ind_2p
SFX Bt emmo avimo . is:imperfect_ind_1p
SFX Bt emmo avan . is:imperfect_ind_3p
SFX Bt emmo aiò . is:future_ind_1s
SFX Bt emmo aiæ/atae . is:future_ind_2s is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Bt emmo aià/ae . is:future_ind_3s
SFX Bt emmo aiemo . is:future_ind_1p
SFX Bt emmo aiei . is:future_ind_2p
SFX Bt emmo aian . is:future_ind_3p
SFX Bt emmo esse/ae . is:imperfect_subj_1s is:imperfect_subj_3s
SFX Bt emmo esci/at . is:imperfect_subj_2s is:imperfect_subj_2p
SFX Bt emmo escimo . is:imperfect_subj_1p
SFX Bt emmo essan . is:imperfect_subj_3p
SFX Bt emmo aieiva/ae . is:conditional_1s is:conditional_3s
SFX Bt emmo aiësci/at . is:conditional_2s is:conditional_2p
SFX Bt emmo aiëscimo . is:conditional_1p
SFX Bt emmo aieivan . is:conditional_3p
SFX Bt emmo aiæn . is:conditional_3p

SFX BL Y 4
SFX BL io e/ae . is:infinitive is:present_ind_3s is:present_subj_1s is:present_subj_3s
SFX BL 0 0 . is:present_ind_1s
SFX BL io i/at . is:present_ind_2s is:present_subj_2s is:imperative_2s
SFX BL io ian . is:present_ind_3p is:present_subj_3p
